Mississippi, session 2026, HB486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic term, the local school board of each public school district shall adopt a policy that authorizes each school under its jurisdiction to provide employees of the school district with cost-free admission into all school-sponsored and Mississippi High School Activities Association governed athletic and extracurricular events hosted by the school district of employment.  For purposes of this section, the policy may be reflected in the school district's employment contracts entered into with instructional and noninstructional employees, which shall consider such cost-free admission as compensatory component of such employees' salary.  The policy shall further stipulate that the cost-free admission shall only be applicable to the district employee and shall not be transferable or extended to any other third party recipient, including spouses or children. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.